numbers.lexd
PATTERNS
N1-19

[sepohual:1] AND0-19
N2-19 [\ pohual:] AND0-19

N1-19 [\ tsontli:0] AND0-19
N1-19 [\ tsontli:] AND [sepohual:1] AND0-19
N1-19 [\ tsontli:] AND N2-19 [\ pohual:] AND0-19

PATTERN AND0-19
[:0]
AND N1-19

PATTERN N1-19
[se:1]
N2-19

LEXICON AND
\ huan\ :

LEXICON N2-19
ome:2
eyi:3
nahui:4
makuil:5
chikuasen:6
chikome:7
chikeyi:8
chiknahui:9
majtakti:a
majtakti\ huan\ se:b
majtakti\ huan\ ome:c
majtakti\ huan\ eyi:d
majtakti\ huan\ nahui:e
kaxtol:f
kaxtol\ huan\ se:g
kaxtol\ huan\ ome:h
kaxtol\ huan\ eyi:i
kaxtol\ huan\ nahui:j
